District of Columbia statutes.
7-2231.09

Private sector vulnerability assessments and mitigation plans.

The Director shall request the voluntary sharing of information from private entities on best practices for prevention, mitigation, response, and recovery from a terrorist or other security incident, including information on relocation and other business continuity plans and programs, for the purpose of collaboration to improve public and private preparedness.

History

Aug. 11, 1950, 64 Stat. 440, ch. 686, § 209
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262, § 101(e), 54 DCR 794

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3008 of Fiscal Year 2009 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-468, July 28, 2008, 55 DCR 8746).